Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.666, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following words have the meanings given. (a) "Firearm" means a device designed to be used as a weapon, from which is expelled a projectile by the force of any explosion or force of combustion. (b) "Child" means a person under the age of 18 years. (c) "Loaded" means the firearm has ammunition in the chamber or magazine, if the magazine is in the firearmdeleted text begin , unless the firearm is incapable of being fired by a child who is likely to gain access to the firearmdeleted text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.666, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Access to firearms. A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who negligently stores or leaves a loaded firearm in a location where the person knows, or reasonably should know, that a child new text begin or a person prohibited from possessing firearms under section 624.713, subdivision 1, new text end is likely to gain access, unless reasonable action is taken to secure the firearm against access by the childnew text begin or the person prohibited from possessing firearmsnew text end .